Mississippi statutes. Title 93. Domestic Relations
ARTICLE 4 Conservatorship

§ 93-20-401.
Basis for appointment of conservator.

For a minor. The court may appoint a conservator for the property or financial affairs of a minor if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that appointment of a conservator is in the minor’s best interest, and:

If the minor has a parent, the court gives weight to any recommendation of the parent whether an appointment is in the minor’s best interest; and

Either:

The minor owns funds or other property requiring management or protection that otherwise cannot be provided;

The minor has or may have financial affairs that may be put at unreasonable risk or hindered because of the minor’s age; or

Appointment is necessary or desirable to obtain or provide funds or other property needed for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the minor.

For an adult.The court may appoint a conservator for the property or financial affairs of an adult if the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that:

The adult is unable to manage property or financial affairs because:

Of a limitation in the adult’s ability to receive and evaluate information or make or communicate decisions, even with the use of appropriate supportive services or technological assistance;

The adult is missing, detained, incarcerated, or unable to return to the United States;

Appointment is necessary to:

Avoid harm to the adult or significant dissipation of the property of the adult; or

Obtain or provide funds or other property needed for the support, care, education, health, or welfare of the adult or of an individual entitled to the adult’s support; and

The respondent’s identified needs cannot be met by a less restrictive alternative.

The court shall grant a conservator only those powers necessitated by demonstrated limitations and needs of the respondent and issue orders that will encourage development of the respondent’s maximum self-determination and independence. The court may not establish a full conservatorship if a limited conservatorship or other less restrictive alternative would meet the needs of the respondent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-402.
Petition for appointment of conservator; notice.

A person interested in the estate, financial affairs, or welfare of the individual, including a person that would be adversely affected by lack of effective management of property or financial affairs of the individual, may petition for the appointment of a conservator for the individual.

The proceeding may be instituted by the chancellor or clerk of the chancery court, any relative or friend of the individual, or any other interested party, including the individual for whom the order is sought, by filing a sworn petition in the chancery court of the residence of the individual setting forth that the individual is alleged to be in need of a conservatorship.

The petition must state the name and address of an attorney representing the petitioner, if any, and must set forth under the style of the case and before the body of the petition the following language in bold or highlighted type:

“THE RELIEF SOUGHT IN THIS PETITION MAY AFFECT YOUR LEGAL RIGHTS. YOU HAVE A RIGHT TO NOTICE OF ANY HEARING ON THIS PETITION, TO ATTEND ANY HEARING, AND TO BE REPRESENTED BY AN ATTORNEY.”

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-403.
Notice and hearing for appointment of conservator.

On receipt of a petition under Section 93-20-402 for appointment of a conservator for a respondent, the court must set a date, time, and place for a hearing on the petition and shall cause not less than seven (7) days’ notice thereof to be given to the person for whom the conservator is to be appointed, except that the court may, for good cause shown, direct that a shorter notice be given.

In a proceeding on a petition under Section 93-20-402, notice of the hearing also must be given to any of the persons required to be listed in the petition under subsection (3) and any other person interested in the respondent’s welfare the court determines. Failure to give notice under this subsection does not preclude the court from appointing a conservator.

Unless the court finds that the respondent for whom the conservator is to be appointed is competent and joins in the petition, the notice shall also be given to the following persons, listed in order of preference, so that personal service is had on the person for whom the conservator is to be appointed and on at least one (1) relative who resides in Mississippi, other than the petitioner:

If the person for whom the conservator is to be appointed is entitled to any benefit, estate or income paid or payable by or through the Veterans’ Administration of the United States government, such administration shall also be given notice.

Notice of a hearing on a petition seeking an order under this article that is filed after the appointment of a conservator, together with a copy of the petition, must be given to the respondent, the conservator, and any other person the court determines.

Each of the spouse, children, parents and siblings of the respondent for whom the conservator is to be appointed, but if none of those can be found, then to:

One (1) adult relative of the person for whom the conservator is to be appointed who is not the petitioner and who resides in Mississippi if that relative is within the third degree of kinship. If no relative within the third degree of kinship to the person for whom the conservator is to be appointed is found residing in the State of Mississippi, the court must either designate some other appropriate person to receive the notice or appoint a guardian ad litem to receive notice.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-404.
Order to preserve or apply property while proceeding pending.

While a petition under Section 93-20-402 is pending, after preliminary hearing and without notice to others, the court may issue an order to preserve and apply property of the respondent as required for the support of the respondent or an individual who is in fact dependent on the respondent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-405.
Appointment and role of guardian ad litem.

The court may appoint a guardian ad litem to any respondent and allow suitable compensation payable out of the estate of the respondent, but the appointment shall not be made unless the court considers it necessary for the protection of the interest of the respondent; a judgment of any court is not void or erroneous because of the failure to have a guardian ad litem.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-406.
Appointment of attorney.

If the respondent in a proceeding for appointment of a conservator is not represented by an attorney, the court, in its discretion, may appoint an attorney to represent the respondent.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-407.
Professional evaluation.

The chancery court must conduct a hearing to determine whether a conservator is needed for the respondent. Before the hearing, the court, in its discretion, may appoint a guardian ad litem to look after the interest of the person in question, and the guardian ad litem must be present at the hearing and present the interests of the respondent.

The chancery judge shall be the judge of the number and character of the witnesses and proof to be presented, except that the proof must include certificates made after a personal examination of the respondent by the following professionals, each of whom must make in writing a certificate of the result of that examination to be filed with the clerk of the court and become a part of the record of the case

Two (2) licensed physicians; or

One (1) licensed physician and either one (1) licensed psychologist, nurse practitioner, or physician’s assistant.

The personal examination may occur face-to-face or via telemedicine, but any telemedicine examination must be made using an audiovisual connection by a physician licensed in this state and as defined in Section 83-9-351. A nurse practitioner or physician assistant conducting an examination shall not also be in a collaborative or supervisory relationship, as the law may otherwise require, with the physician conducting the examination. A professional conducting an examination under this section may also be called to testify at the hearing.

The personal examination requirement in subsections (2) and (3) shall not apply if the respondent is missing, detained or unable to return to the United States.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-408.
Rights at hearing.

At a hearing under Section 93-20-403, the respondent may:

Present evidence and subpoena witnesses and documents;

Examine witnesses; and

Otherwise participate in the hearing.

Unless excused by the court for good cause, a proposed conservator must attend a hearing under Section 93-20-403.

A hearing under Section 93-20-403 must be closed on request of the respondent and a showing of good cause.

Any person may request to participate in a hearing under Section 93-20-403. The court may grant the request, with or without a hearing, on determining that the best interest of the respondent will be served. The court may impose appropriate conditions on the person’s participation.

§ 93-20-409.
Confidentiality of records.

An individual subject to a proceeding for a conservatorship, an attorney designated by the respondent or ward, and a person entitled to notice either under Section 93-20-411(5) or court order may access court records of the proceeding and resulting conservatorship, including the conservator’s plan under Section 93-20-419 and the conservator’s report under Section 93-20-423. A person not otherwise entitled to access to court records under this section for good cause may petition the court for access to court records of the conservatorship, including the conservator’s plan and report. The court must grant access if access is in the best interest of the respondent or ward or furthers the public interest and does not endanger the welfare or financial interests of the respondent or individual.

A report under Section 93-20-405 of a guardian ad litem or professional evaluation under Section 93-20-407 may be confidential and may be sealed on filing when determined necessary by the court. If the court finds the file should be sealed, the file shall remain available to:

The court;

The individual who is the subject of the report or evaluation, without limitation as to use;

The petitioner, guardian ad litem and petitioner’s and respondent’s attorneys, for purposes of the proceeding;

Unless the court directs otherwise, a person appointed under a power of attorney for finances in which the respondent is identified as the principal; and

Any other person if it is in the public interest or for a purpose the court orders for good cause.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-410.
Who may be conservator.

Appointment of a conservator is at the discretion of the court, and in the best interest of the respondent. If two (2) or more persons have requested responsibility as conservator, the court shall select as conservator the person the court considers best qualified. In determining the best qualified person, the court shall consider the person’s relationship with the respondent, the person’s skills, the expressed wishes of the respondent including any designation made in a will, durable power of attorney, or health-care directive, the extent to which the person and the respondent have similar values and preferences, and the likelihood the person will be able to perform the duties of a conservator successfully. The court, acting in the best interest of the respondent, may decline to appoint as conservator a person requesting the appointment.

If a qualified conservator cannot be determined, the court, in its discretion, may appoint the chancery court clerk or probate administrator for the county in which the proceedings were filed to serve as the respondent’s conservator. The chancery court clerk or the probate administrator shall serve in the capacity ordered by the court unless a conflict of interest arises or the clerk or the probate administrator presents circumstances where the court determines the clerk’s recusal from appointment is permitted.

A person that provides paid services to the respondent, or an individual who is employed by a person that provides paid services to the respondent or is the spouse, parent, or child of an individual who provides or is employed to provide paid services to the respondent, may not be appointed as conservator unless:

The individual is related to the respondent by blood, marriage, or adoption; or

The court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the person is the best qualified person available for appointment and the appointment is in the best interest of the respondent.

An owner, operator, or employee of a long-term-care institution at which the respondent is receiving care may not be appointed as conservator unless the owner, operator, or employee is related to the respondent by blood, marriage, or adoption.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-411.
Order on appointment of conservator.

A court order appointing a conservator for a minor must include findings to support appointment of a conservator and, if a full conservatorship is granted, the reason a limited conservatorship would not meet the identified needs of the minor.

A court order appointing a conservator for an adult must:

Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence has established that the identified needs of the respondent cannot be met by a less restrictive alternative, including use of appropriate supportive services or technological assistance; and

Include a specific finding that clear and convincing evidence established that the respondent was given proper notice of the hearing on the petition.

A court order establishing a full conservatorship for an adult must state the basis for granting a full conservatorship and include specific findings to support the conclusion that a limited conservatorship would not meet the functional needs of the adult.

A court order establishing a limited conservatorship must state the specific property placed under the control of the conservator and the powers granted to the conservator.

The court, as part of an order establishing a conservatorship, must identify and include the contact information for any person that subsequently is entitled to:

Notice of the rights of the ward under Section 93-20-412(2);

Notice of a sale of or surrender of a lease to the primary dwelling of the individual;

Notice that the conservator has delegated a power that requires court approval under Section 93-20-414 or substantially all powers of the conservator;

Notice that the conservator will be unavailable to perform the conservator’s duties for more than one (1) month;

A copy of the conservator’s plan under Section 93-20-419 and the conservator’s report under Section 93-20-423;

Access to court records relating to the conservatorship;

Notice of a transaction involving a substantial conflict between the conservator’s fiduciary duties and personal interests;

Notice of the death or significant change in the condition of the individual;

Notice that the court has limited or modified the powers of the conservator; and

Notice of the removal of the conservator.

If a ward is an adult, the spouse and adult children of the ward are entitled under subsection (5) to notice unless the court determines notice would be contrary to the preferences or prior directions of the ward or are not in the best interest of the ward.

If a ward is a minor, each parent and adult sibling of the minor is entitled to notice under subsection (5) unless the court determines notice would not be in the best interest of the minor.

If the chancellor finds from the evidence that the person is in need of a conservatorship, the chancellor must appoint a conservator over the person.

The costs and expenses of the proceedings shall be paid out of the estate of the respondent if a conservator is appointed. If a conservator is not appointed, the costs and expenses shall be paid by the person instituting the proceedings.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-412.
Notice of order of appointment; rights.

A conservator appointed under Section 93-20-411 must give to the ward and to all other persons given notice under Section 93-20-403 a copy of the order of appointment. The order and notice must be given not later than fourteen (14) days after the appointment.

Not later than fourteen (14) days after appointment of a conservator under Section 93-20-411, the court must give to the ward, the conservator, and any other person entitled to notice under Section 93-20-411(5), a statement of the rights of the ward and procedures to seek relief if the ward is denied those rights. The statement must be in plain language, in at least sixteen-point font, and to the extent feasible, in a language in which the ward is proficient. The statement must notify the ward of the right to:

Seek termination or modification of the conservatorship, or removal of the conservator, and choose an attorney to represent the individual in these matters;

Participate in decision-making to the extent reasonably feasible;

Receive a copy of the conservator’s plan under Section 93-20-419, the conservator’s inventory under Section 93-20-420, and the conservator’s report under Section 93-20-423; and

Object to the conservator’s inventory, plan, or report.

If a conservator is appointed for the reasons stated in Section 93-20-401(2)(a)(ii) and the ward is missing, notice under this section to the individual is not required.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-413.
Emergency conservator.

Upon a petition by a person interested in an individual’s welfare or a petition filed under Section 93-20-402, the court may appoint an emergency conservator for the individual if the court finds:

Appointment of an emergency conservator is likely to prevent substantial and irreparable harm to the individual’s property or financial interests;

No other person appears to have authority and willingness to act in the circumstances; and

There is reason to believe that a basis for appointment of a conservator under Section 93-20-401 exists.

The duration of authority of an emergency conservator may not exceed sixty (60) days and the emergency conservator may exercise only the powers specified in the order of appointment. The emergency conservator’s authority may be extended once for not more than sixty (60) days if the court finds that the conditions for appointment of an emergency conservator under subsection (1) continue.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4), reasonable notice of the date, time, and place of a hearing on the petition must be given to the respondent, the respondent’s attorney, and any other person the court determines.

The court may appoint an emergency conservator without notice to the respondent and any attorney for the respondent only if the court finds from an affidavit or testimony that the respondent’s property or financial interests will be substantially and irreparably harmed before a hearing with notice on the appointment can be held. If the court appoints an emergency conservator without giving notice under subsection (3), the court must give notice of the appointment not later than forty-eight (48) hours after the appointment to:

The respondent;

The respondent’s attorney;

Any other person the court determines; and

Hold a hearing on the appropriateness of the appointment not later than five (5) days after the appointment.

Appointment of an emergency conservator under this section is not a determination that a basis exists for appointment of a conservator under Section 93-20-401.

The court may remove an emergency conservator appointed under this section at any time. The emergency conservator shall make any report the court requires.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-414.
Powers of conservator requiring court approval.

Except as otherwise ordered by the court, a conservator must give notice to persons entitled to notice under Section 93-20-411(5) and receive specific authorization by the court before the conservator may exercise with respect to the conservatorship the power to:

Make a gift;

Sell, encumber an interest in, or surrender a lease to the primary dwelling of the ward;

Convey, release, or disclaim a contingent or expectant interest in property, including marital property and any right of survivorship incident to joint tenancy or tenancy by the entireties;

Exercise or release a power of appointment;

Create a revocable or irrevocable trust of property of the conservatorship estate, whether or not the trust extends beyond the duration of the conservatorship, or revoke or amend a trust revocable by the ward;

Exercise a right to elect an option or change a beneficiary under an insurance policy or annuity or surrender the policy or annuity for its cash value;

Exercise a right to an elective share in the estate of a deceased spouse of the ward or renounce or disclaim a property interest;

Grant a creditor priority for payment over creditors of the same or higher class if the creditor is providing property or services used to meet the basic living and care needs of the ward and preferential treatment otherwise would be impermissible under Section 93-20-427(6);

Make, modify, amend, or revoke the will of the ward in compliance with Section 91-5-1 et seq.;

Pay premiums on any insurance policy issued on the life of the ward if the individual is a minor, the policy was issued during the lifetime of the individual’s deceased parent, and the court finds the policy’s continuance is warranted;

Acquire or dispose of real property, including real property in another state, for cash or on credit, at public or private sale, and manage, develop, improve, exchange, partition, change the character of, or abandon property;

Make repairs or alterations in a building or other structure, demolish any improvement, or raze an existing or erect a new wall or building if costs exceed Two Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($2,500.00);

Subdivide or develop land, dedicate land to public use, make or obtain the vacation of a plat and adjust a boundary, adjust a difference in valuation of land, exchange or partition land by giving or receiving consideration, and dedicate an easement to public use without consideration;

Enter for any purpose into a lease of property as lessor or lessee, with or without an option to purchase or renew, for a term within or extending beyond the term of the conservatorship;

Enter into a lease or arrangement for exploration and removal of minerals or other natural resources or a pooling or unitization agreement;

Borrow funds, with or without security, to be repaid from the conservatorship estate or otherwise;

Pay or contest a claim, settle a claim by or against the conservatorship estate or the ward by compromise, arbitration, or otherwise, or release, in whole or in part, a claim belonging to the conservatorship estate to the extent the claim is uncollectible; or

Bring an action, claim, or proceeding in any jurisdiction for the protection of the conservatorship estate or the conservator in the performance of the conservator’s duties;

In approving a conservator’s exercise of a power listed in subsection (1), the court must consider the ward’s prior or current directions, preferences, opinions, values, and actions, to the extent actually known or reasonably ascertainable by the conservator. The court also must consider:

The financial needs of the ward and individuals who are in fact dependent on the ward for support, and the interests of creditors of the individual;

Possible reduction of income, estate, inheritance, or other tax liabilities;

Eligibility for governmental assistance;

The previous pattern of giving or level of support provided by the individual;

Any existing estate plan or lack of estate plan of the individual;

The life expectancy of the individual and the probability the conservatorship will terminate before the ward’s death; and

Any other relevant factor.

A conservator may not revoke or amend a power of attorney for finances executed by the ward. If a power of attorney for finances is in effect, a decision of the conservator takes precedence over that of the attorney-in-fact only to the extent of the authorization granted to the conservator by court order.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-415.
Petition for order after appointment.

A ward or a person interested in the welfare of the individual may petition for an order:

Requiring the conservator to furnish a bond or collateral or additional bond or collateral or allowing a reduction in a bond or collateral previously furnished;

Requiring an accounting for the administration of the conservatorship estate;

Directing distribution;

Removing the conservator and appointing a temporary or successor conservator;

Modifying the type of appointment or powers granted to the conservator, if the extent of protection or management previously granted is excessive or insufficient to meet the individual’s needs, including because the individual’s abilities or supports have changed;

Rejecting or modifying the conservator’s plan under Section 93-20-419, the conservator’s inventory under Section 93-20-420, or the conservator’s report under Section 93-20-423; or

Granting other appropriate relief.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-416.
Bond; oath; waiver; financial institutions; alternative asset-protection arrangement.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the court shall require a conservator to furnish a bond with a surety the court specifies, or require an alternative asset-protection arrangement, conditioned on faithful discharge of all duties of the conservator. The court may waive or partially waive the requirement if:

The respondent is a minor and the minor’s parent has waived the requirement in a valid holographic will or another instrument to take effect at the parent’s death that is signed by the parent and attested by two (2) or more credible witnesses, not including the person nominated as conservator; or

Part of the assets of the ward’s estate are deposited in one or more banking corporations, building and loan associations or savings and loan associations (“financial institutions”) in this state if the deposits are fully insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation (FDIC) and will remain on deposit in that institution until further order of the court, a certified copy or MEC-filed copy of the order for deposit having been furnished to the depository or depositories and its receipt acknowledged in a form that substantially complies with subsection (7); or

The court finds that a bond or other asset-protection arrangement is not necessary to protect the interests of the individual subject to conservatorship. Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3), the court may not waive the requirement of bond or other asset-protection arrangement if the conservator is in the business of serving as a conservator and is being paid for the conservator’s service.

Unless the court directs otherwise, the bond required under this section must be in the amount of the aggregate capital value of the conservatorship estate, plus one (1) year’s estimated income, less the value of property deposited under an arrangement requiring a court order for its removal and real property the conservator lacks power to sell or convey without specific court authorization. The court, in place of surety on a bond, may accept collateral for the performance of the bond, including a pledge of securities or a mortgage of real property.

A banking institution insured by the FDIC qualified to do trust business in this state is not required to give a bond under this section.

Every bond must be filed in the records of the chancery court and may be put in suit for any breach of the condition, whether the appointment be legal or not; and the condition shall be as follows:

Click to view

The conservator must also take and subscribe on oath, at or before the conservator’s appointment, faithfully to discharge the duties of conservator of the ward according to law.

A financial institution that substantially complies with the provisions of this article when acting as a depository of conservatorship funds is not liable to any person for so acting except for willful default, gross negligence or malfeasance.

A financial institution that acts as a depository of the funds may charge a fee for servicing the account.

Click to view

“The condition of the above obligation is that if the above bound, as conservator of in County shall faithfully discharge all the duties required of him by law, then the above obligation shall cease.”

ACKNOWLEDGMENT OF RECEIPT OF ORDER FOR DEPOSIT AND RECEIPT OF CASH FUNDS The Chancery Court of , Mississippi, having rendered its order in the above-entitled and numbered cause on the day of , designating a banking institution insured by the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation as the depository of the funds of , by and through , as conservator, and the conservator, having elected to use as the aforesaid depository, I, acting pursuant to my authority in and for said bank, do hereby acknowledge that I have received a copy of the order of the chancery court, duly certified as true and correct by the chancery clerk of , Mississippi, or a MEC-filed copy of the order of the chancery court. I further note that said order provides that all funds so deposited to the account shall remain on deposit until further order of the court. County (Name of Financial Institution) County Receipt is also hereby acknowledged of the funds in the amount of $ in this matter. hereby acknowledges that the funds, described above, shall not be disbursed without further order of this court. (Name of Financial Institution) This the day of, . STATE OF MISSISSIPPI COUNTY OF Personally came and appeared before me, the undersigned authority in and for the jurisdiction aforesaid, the within named , who is of and who acknowledged to me that he/she signed and delivered the above and foregoing Acknowledgment of Receipt of Order for Deposit and Receipt of Cash Funds as the act and deed of said bank, he/she being first duly authorized so to do. (Name of Bank Officer) (Job Title) (Name of Financial Institution) Given under my hand and official seal, this the day of , . Notary Public My commission expires

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-417.
Terms and requirements of bond.

The following rules apply to the bond required under Section 93-20-416:

Except as otherwise provided by the bond, the surety and the conservator are jointly and severally liable.

By executing a bond provided by a conservator, the surety submits to the personal jurisdiction of the court that issued letters of office to the conservator in a proceeding relating to the duties of the conservator in which the surety is named as a party. Notice of the proceeding must be given to the surety at the address shown in the records of the court in which the bond is filed and any other address of the surety then known to the person required to provide the notice.

On petition of a successor conservator or person affected by a breach of the obligation of the bond, a proceeding may be brought against the surety for breach of the obligation of the bond.

A proceeding against the bond may be brought until liability under the bond is exhausted.

A proceeding may not be brought under this section against a surety of a bond on a matter as to which a proceeding against the conservator is barred.

If a bond under Section 93-20-416 is not renewed by the conservator, the surety or sureties immediately must give notice to the court and the attorney for the conservatorship.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.

§ 93-20-418.
Duties of conservator.

A conservator is a fiduciary and has duties of prudence and loyalty to the ward.

A conservator must promote the self-determination of the ward and, to the extent feasible, encourage the ward to participate in decisions, act on the ward’s own behalf, and develop or regain the capacity to manage the ward’s personal affairs.

In making a decision for a ward, the conservator must make the decision the conservator reasonably believes the ward would make if able, unless doing so would fail to preserve the resources needed to maintain the ward’s well-being and lifestyle or otherwise unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the ward. To determine the decision the ward would make if able, the conservator must consider the ward’s prior or current directions, preferences, opinions, values, and actions, to the extent actually known or reasonably ascertainable by the conservator.

If a conservator cannot make a decision under subsection (3) because the conservator does not know and cannot reasonably determine the decision the ward probably would make if able, or the conservator reasonably believes the decision the individual would make would fail to preserve resources needed to maintain the ward’s well-being and lifestyle or otherwise unreasonably harm or endanger the welfare or personal or financial interests of the ward, the conservator shall act in accordance with the best interest of the ward. In determining the best interest of the ward, the conservator shall consider:

Information received from professionals and persons who demonstrate sufficient interest in the welfare of the ward;

Other information the conservator believes the ward would have considered if the ward were able to act; and

Other factors a reasonable person in the circumstances of the ward would consider, including consequences for others.

Except when inconsistent with the conservator’s duties under subsections (1) through (4), and where investments other than in FDIC-insured investments are permitted in the court’s order approving the conservator’s plan, a conservator must invest and manage the conservatorship estate as a prudent investor would, by considering:

The circumstances of the ward and the conservatorship estate;

General economic conditions;

The possible effect of inflation or deflation;

The expected tax consequences of an investment decision or strategy;

The role of each investment or course of action in relation to the conservatorship estate as a whole;

The expected total return from income and appreciation of capital;

The need for liquidity, regularity of income, and preservation or appreciation of capital; and

The special relationship or value, if any, of specific property to the ward.

The propriety of a conservator’s investment and management of the conservatorship estate is determined in light of the facts and circumstances existing when the conservator decides or acts and not by hindsight.

A conservator must make a reasonable effort to verify facts relevant to the investment and management of the conservatorship estate.

A conservator that has special skills or expertise, or is named conservator in reliance on the conservator’s representation of special skills or expertise, has a duty to use the special skills or expertise in carrying out the conservator’s duties.

In investing, selecting specific property for distribution, and invoking a power of revocation or withdrawal for the use or benefit of the ward, a conservator must consider any estate plan of the ward known or reasonably ascertainable to the conservator and may examine the will or other donative, nominative, or appointive instrument of the individual.

A conservator must maintain insurance on the insurable real and personal property of the ward, unless the conservatorship estate lacks sufficient funds to pay for insurance or the court finds:

The property lacks sufficient equity; or

Insuring the property would unreasonably dissipate the conservatorship estate or otherwise not be in the best interest of the ward.

A conservator has access to and authority over a digital asset of the ward to the extent provided by the Revised Uniform Fiduciary Access to Digital Assets Act (Title 91, Chapter 23, Mississippi Code of 1972).

A conservator for an adult must notify the court if the condition of the adult has changed so that the adult has become capable of autonomy in exercising rights previously delegated to the conservator. The notice must be given immediately on learning of the change.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2019, ch. 463, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2020.